Hawaii statutes.
[§339D-5] Retailer responsibility. Beginning
January 1, 2010, retailers shall make available to their customers information
on collection services in the State, including the department's website and
toll-free telephone number. Remote retailers may include this information in a
visible location on their website to fulfill this requirement. [L Sp 2008, c
13, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next